Hawaii statutes.
§576B-207 Determination of controlling
child support order. (a) If a proceeding is brought under this chapter
and only one tribunal has issued a child support order, the order of that
tribunal controls and shall be recognized.

(b) If a proceeding is brought under this
chapter, and two or more child support orders have been issued by tribunals of
this State, another state, or a foreign country with regard to the same obligor
and same child, a tribunal of this State having personal jurisdiction over both
the obligor and individual obligee shall apply the following rules and by order
shall determine which order shall control and be recognized:

(1) If only one of the tribunals would have
continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter, the order of that
tribunal controls.

(2) If more than one of the tribunals would have
continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter:

(A) An order issued by a tribunal in the
current home state of the child controls; or

(B) If an order has not been issued in the
current home state of the child, the order most recently issued controls.

(3) If none of the tribunals would have continuing,
exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter, the tribunal of this State shall
issue a child support order, which controls.

(c) If two or more child support orders have
been issued for the same obligor and same child, upon request of a party who is
an individual or that is a support enforcement agency, a tribunal of this State
having personal jurisdiction over both the obligor and the obligee who is an
individual shall determine which order controls under subsection (b). The
request may be filed with a registration for enforcement or registration for
modification pursuant to Article 6, or may be filed as a separate proceeding.

(d) A request to determine which is the
controlling order shall be accompanied by a copy of every child support order
in effect and the applicable record of payments. The requesting party shall
give notice of the request to each party whose rights may be affected by the
determination.

For the purposes of this subsection, service of
the notice shall be by personal service or certified mail, return receipt
requested. After initial service is effected, additional service upon a party
shall be satisfied by regular mail to the party's last known address. In any
child support enforcement proceedings subsequent to an order, upon a showing
that diligent effort has been made to ascertain the location of a party, notice
of service of process shall be presumed to be satisfied upon delivery of
written notice to the most recent residential or employer address on file with
the state case registry.

(e) The tribunal that issued the controlling
order under subsection (a), (b), or (c) has continuing jurisdiction to the
extent provided in section 576B-205 or 576B-206.

(f) A tribunal of this State that determines
by order which is the controlling order under subsection (b)(1) or (2) or (c),
or that issues a new controlling order under subsection (b)(3), shall state in
that order:

(1) The basis upon which the tribunal made its
determination;

(2) The amount of prospective support, if any; and

(3) The total amount of consolidated arrears and
accrued interest, if any, under all of the orders after all payments made are
credited as provided by section 576B-209.

(g) Within thirty days after issuance of an
order determining which is the controlling order, the party obtaining the order
shall file a certified copy of it in each tribunal that issued or registered an
earlier order of child support. A party or support enforcement agency
obtaining the order that fails to file a certified copy is subject to
appropriate sanctions by a tribunal in which the issue of failure to file
arises. The failure to file does not affect the validity or enforceability of
the controlling order.

(h) An order that has been determined to be
the controlling order, or a judgment for consolidated arrears of support and
interest, if any, made pursuant to this section must be recognized in
proceedings under this chapter. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 1998, c 270, §1;
am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next